nl: Type creatine: Gebufferde creatine; Creatinecitraat; Creatine-ethylester; Creatinemalaat; Creatinenitraat; Hydrochloride (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Gemicroniseerd monohydraat; Monohydraat; Tri-creatinemalaat; Andere
cs: Typ kreatinu: Pufrovaný kreatin; Kreatin citrát; Kreatin ethyl ester; Kreatin malát; Kreatin nitrát; Hydrochlorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronizovaný monohydrát; Monohydrát; Tri-kreatin malát; Jiné
pl: Typ kreatyny: Kreatyna buforowana; Cytrynian kreatyny; Ester etylowy kreatyny; Jabłczan kreatyny; Azotan kreatyny; Chlorowodorek (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronizowany monohydrat; Monohydrat; Trijabłczan kreatyny; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de creatină: Creatină tamponată; Citrat de creatină; Ester etilic de creatină; Malat de creatină; Nitrat de creatină; Clorhidrat (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Monohidrat micronizat; Monohidrat; Tri-malat de creatină; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de creatina: Creatina tamponada; Citrato de creatina; Éster etílico de creatina; Malato de creatina; Nitrato de creatina; Cloridrato (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Monoidrato micronizado; Monoidrato; Tri-malato de creatina; Outro
zh-TW: 肌酸類型: 緩衝肌酸; 檸檬酸肌酸; 肌酸乙酯; 蘋果酸肌酸; 硝酸肌酸; 鹽酸 (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; 微粒化一水合物; 一水合物; 三肌酸蘋果酸; 其他
ru: Тип креатина: Буферизованный креатин; Цитрат креатина; Этиловый эфир креатина; Малат креатина; Нитрат креатина; Гидрохлорид (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Микронизированный моногидрат; Моногидрат; Три-креатин малат; Другой
ko: 크레아틴 유형: 완충 크레아틴; 크레아틴 시트레이트; 크레아틴 에틸 에스터; 크레아틴 말레이트; 크레아틴 니트레이트; 염산염 (HCL); 크레알칼린; 미세분말 일수화물; 일수화물; 트리 크레아틴 말레이트; 기타
bg-BG: Тип креатин: Буфериран креатин; Креатин цитрат; Креатин етил естер; Креатин малат; Креатин нитрат; Хидрохлорид (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Микронизиран монохидрат; Монохидрат; Три-креатин малат; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta kreatina: Pufriran kreatin; Kreatin citrat; Kreatin etil ester; Kreatin malat; Kreatin nitrat; Hidroklorid (HCL); Kre-alkalyn; Mikroniziran monohidrat; Monohidrat; Tri-kreatin malat; Drugo
fr: Type de créatine: Créatine tamponnée; Citrate de créatine; Ester éthylique de créatine; Malate de créatine; Nitrate de créatine; Chlorhydrate (HCl); Kre-Alkalyn; Monohydrate micronisé; Monohydrate; Malate de tri-créatine; Autre
hu: Kreatintípus: Pufferelt kreatin; Kreatin-citrát; Kreatin-etil-észter; Kreatin-malát; Kreatin-nitrát; Hidroklorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronizált monohidrát; Monohidrát; Tri-kreatin-malát; Egyéb
el: Τύπος κρεατίνης: Ρυθμισμένη κρεατίνη; Κιτρική κρεατίνη; Αιθυλεστέρας κρεατίνης; Μηλική κρεατίνη; Νιτρική κρεατίνη; Υδροχλωρική (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Μικροποιημένη μονοϋδρική; Μονοϋδρική; Τρι-μηλική κρεατίνη; Άλλο
da: Kreatintype: Bufferet kreatin; Kreatincitrat; Kreatinethylester; Kreatinmalat; Kreatinnitrat; Hydroklorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikroniseret monohydrat; Monohydrat; Tri-kreatinmalat; Andet
tr: Kreatin türü: Tamponlanmış kreatin; Kreatin sitrat; Kreatin etil ester; Kreatin malat; Kreatin nitrat; Hidroklorür (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronize monohidrat; Monohidrat; Tri-kreatin malat; Diğer
nb: Kreatintype: Bufret kreatin; Kreatinsitrat; Kreatinetylester; Kreatinmalat; Kreatinnitrat; Hydroklorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronisert monohydrat; Monohydrat; Tri-kreatinmalat; Annet
ja: クレアチンタイプ: バッファードクレアチン; クレアチンクエン酸塩; クレアチンエチルエステル; クレアチンリンゴ酸塩; クレアチン硝酸塩; 塩酸塩（HCL）; クレアルカリン; 微粉化モノハイドレート; モノハイドレート; トリクレアチンリンゴ酸塩; その他
fi: Kreatiinin tyyppi: Puskuroitu kreatiini; Kreatiinisitraatti; Kreatiinietyyliestteri; Kreatiinimalaatti; Kreatiininitraatti; Hydrokloridi (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronoitu monohydraatti; Monohydraatti; Trikreatiinimalaatti; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de creatina: Creatina tamponada; Citrato de creatina; Éster etílico de creatina; Malato de creatina; Nitrato de creatina; Cloridrato (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Monohidrato micronizado; Monohidrato; Tri-malato de creatina; Outro
sk-SK: Typ kreatínu: Pufrovaný kreatín; Kreatín citrát; Kreatín etyl ester; Kreatín malát; Kreatín nitrát; Hydrochlorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronizovaný monohydrát; Monohydrát; Tri-kreatín malát; Iné
it: Tipo di creatina: Creatina tamponata; Creatina citrato; Creatina etil estere; Creatina malato; Creatina nitrato; Cloridrato (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Monoidrato micronizzato; Monoidrato; Tri-creatina malato; Altro
vi: Loại creatine: Creatine đệm; Creatine citrate; Creatine ethyl ester; Creatine malate; Creatine nitrate; Hydrochloride (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Monohydrate siêu mịn; Monohydrate; Tri-creatine malate; Khác
lt-LT: Kreatino tipas: Buferinis kreatinas; Kreatino citratas; Kreatino etilo esteris; Kreatino malatas; Kreatino nitratas; Hidrochloridas (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronizuotas monohidratas; Monohidratas; Tri-kreatino malatas; Kita
th: ประเภทครีเอทีน: ครีเอทีนบัฟเฟอร์; ครีเอทีนซิเตรต; ครีเอทีนเอทิลเอสเตอร์; ครีเอทีนมาเลต; ครีเอทีนไนเตรต; ไฮโดรคลอไรด์ (HCL); เคร-อัลคาลิน; โมโนไฮเดรตบดละเอียด; โมโนไฮเดรต; ไตร-ครีเอทีนมาเลต; อื่นๆ
sv: Kreatintyp: Buffrat kreatin; Kreatincitrat; Kreatinletylester; Kreatinmalat; Kreatinnitrat; Hydroklorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikroniserat monohydrat; Monohydrat; Tri-kreatinmalat; Övrigt
zh-CN: 肌酸类型: 缓冲肌酸; 柠檬酸肌酸; 肌酸乙酯; 苹果酸肌酸; 硝酸肌酸; 盐酸盐 (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; 微粉化一水肌酸; 一水肌酸; 三苹果酸肌酸; 其他
es: Tipo de creatina: Creatina tamponada; Citrato de creatina; Éster etílico de creatina; Malato de creatina; Nitrato de creatina; Clorhidrato (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Monohidrato micronizado; Monohidrato; Tri-malato de creatina; Otros
en: Creatine type: Buffered creatine; Creatine citrate; Creatine ethyl ester; Creatine malate; Creatine nitrate; Hydrochloride (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Micronized monohydrate; Monohydrate; Tri-creatine malate; Other
de: Kreatintyp: Gepuffertes Kreatin; Kreatincitrat; Kreatinethylester; Kreatinmalat; Kreatinnitrat; Hydrochlorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronisiertes Monohydrat; Monohydrat; Tri-Kreatinmalat; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta kreatina: Puferirani kreatin; Kreatin citrat; Kreatin etil ester; Kreatin malat; Kreatin nitrat; Hidroklorid (HCL); Kre-Alkalyn; Mikronizirani monohidrat; Monohidrat; Tri-kreatin malat; Ostalo